Utah statutes.
78B-10-112.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act.
This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does
not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that
act.
